Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-3526
Act; exemptions.

The
Motor Vehicle Service Contract Reimbursement Insurance Act shall not apply
to:

(1) Motor vehicle service contracts (a)(i) issued
by a motor vehicle manufacturer or importer for the motor vehicles manufactured
or imported by that manufacturer or importer and (ii) sold
by a franchised motor vehicle dealer licensed pursuant to the Motor Vehicle
Industry Regulation Act or (b) issued and sold directly
by a motor vehicle manufacturer or importer licensed pursuant to the Motor
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act for the motor vehicles manufactured or imported
by that manufacturer or importer;
or

(2) Product warranties
governed by the Magnuson-Moss Warranty - Federal Trade Commission Improvement
Act, 15 U.S.C. 2301 et seq., or to any other warranties, indemnity agreement,
or guarantees that are not provided incidental to the purchase of a vehicle
protection product.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 98;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB1054, § 2.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.